Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Metropolitan Area Waste Disposal

§ 21-27-161.
Declaration of purpose; short title.

Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191 are for the purpose of authorizing a cooperative effort by public agencies for the safe and economical construction and operation of systems for the collection, transportation, treatment and disposal of wastes, including sewerage systems and sewage disposal systems, in order to prevent and control the pollution of the waters in this state. Said sections may be cited as the “Metropolitan Area Waste Disposal Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1975).

§ 21-27-163.
Definitions.

Words and phrases used in Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191 shall have meanings as follows:

“Act” shall mean the Metropolitan Area Waste Disposal Act [Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191], as originally enacted or as hereafter amended.

“Person” means and includes the State of Mississippi, a municipality as defined herein, any public agency as defined herein or any other city, town or political subdivision or governmental agency of the State of Mississippi or of the United States of America, or any individual, copartnership, association, firm, trust, estate or any other entity whatsoever.

“Waterworks” means all works, plants or other facilities necessary for the purpose of collecting, storing, treating and transporting water for domestic, municipal, commercial, industrial, agricultural and manufacturing purposes, including open channels.

“Water supply system” means pipelines, conduits, pumping stations and all other structures, devices and appliances appurtenant thereto, including land and right-of-way thereto, for use for transporting water to a point of ultimate use.

“Waste” means sewage, industrial waste, municipal waste, recreational waste and agricultural waste, waste heat and any other waste that may cause impairment of the quality of the waters in the state.

“Sewerage system” means pipelines or conduits, canals, pumping stations and force mains, and all other structures, devices, facilities and appliances appurtenant thereto, used for collecting or conducting waste to an ultimate point for treatment or disposal.

“Treatment facilities” means any plant, disposal field, lagoon, pumping station, constructed drainage ditch or surface water intercepting ditch, canal, incinerator, area devoted to sanitary landfills or other works not specifically mentioned herein, installed for the purpose of treating, neutralizing, stabilizing or disposing of waste or facilities to provide cooling water to collect, control and dispose of waste heat.

“Sewage disposal system” means a system for disposing of waste, including but not limited to sewerage systems and treatment facilities, as such terms are defined herein.

The terms “pollution,” “waters” or “waters in the state” shall have meanings as set forth in the Mississippi Air and Water Pollution Control Law, as now or hereafter amended, appearing as Section 49-17-1 through Section 49-17-70, Mississippi Code of 1972.

“Municipality” means any incorporated city having a population in excess of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) according to the most recently completed federal decennial census, whether operating under general law or under special charter.

“Metropolitan area” means all of the area or territory lying within the corporate limits of a municipality as herein defined, whether or not such area or territory be contiguous, and all area or territory lying not more than ten (10) miles from the outer boundary of any of the areas or territories comprising a municipality as herein defined, and all of an incorporated city or town, any part of which lies within the aforementioned ten-mile limit.

“Public agency” means any incorporated city or town lying wholly or partially within a metropolitan area, any state board or commission owning or operating properties within a metropolitan area, a district created pursuant to Sections 51-9-101 through 51-9-163, or a political subdivision of the State of Mississippi lying wholly or partially within a metropolitan area and having the power to own and operate waterworks, water supply systems, sewerage systems, treatment facilities or sewage disposal systems or other facilities or systems for the collection, transportation, treatment and disposal of waste.

“Metropolitan area plan” means a comprehensive plan for water quality management and the control and abatement of pollution within the metropolitan area, consistent with applicable water quality standards established pursuant to the Federal Water Pollution Control Act.

“Federal Water Pollution Control Act” shall mean the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, being 33 U.S.C.S. 1151 et seq. as now or hereafter amended, and the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, being P.L. 92-500, 86 Stat. 816 as now or hereafter amended.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1975).

§ 21-27-165.
General powers of municipality as to waste collection, transportation, treatment, or disposal within metropolitan area.

A municipality is authorized and empowered to acquire, construct, improve, enlarge, extend, repair, operate and maintain one or more sewage disposal systems and make contracts with any person or any public agency, under the terms of which the municipality will, within or without the municipality but within its metropolitan area, collect, transport, treat or dispose of waste for such person or public agency. A municipality may also enter into contracts with any person to purchase or sell, by installments over such term as may be deemed desirable, or otherwise, any waste collection, transportation, treatment or sewage disposal facilities or systems. A municipality is also authorized to enter into operating agreements with any person, for such terms and upon such conditions as may be deemed desirable, for the operation of any waste collection, transportation, treatment or sewage disposal facilities or systems of any person by the municipality; and a municipality may lease to or from any person, for such term and upon such conditions as may be deemed desirable, any waste collection, transportation, treatment or sewage disposal facilities or systems.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1975).

§ 21-27-167.
Acquisition of necessary property by municipality.

A municipality shall have the power and right to acquire and to own, maintain, use and operate any and all property of any kind, real, personal or mixed, or any interest therein within or without the boundaries of its metropolitan area necessary or convenient to the exercise of the purposes of and the powers granted by Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191. Within any unincorporated portion of its metropolitan area, a municipality may acquire such property by exercise of the power of eminent domain as provided in Chapter 27, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972. Prior to the exercise of the power of eminent domain within any unincorporated portion of its metropolitan area, a municipality shall seek and obtain a written agreement with the public agency or other person having local jurisdiction of such area for the acquisition of such property. The written agreement provided for herein for the exercise of the power of eminent domain shall be spread upon the minutes of said public agency or person as defined herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1975).

§ 21-27-169.
Municipality may obtain federal assistance.

A municipality is authorized to make such applications and enter into such contracts for financial assistance in comprehensive planning as may be appropriate under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as now or hereafter amended; the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 (P. L. 92-500); under Chapter 23 and Chapter 26, Title 33, United States Code; under Chapter 9, Title 40, United States Code and under any other relevant statutes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1975).

§ 21-27-171.
Contracts with municipalities.

A municipality may enter into contract with any person or public agency situated wholly or partly within its metropolitan area, whether or not lying wholly or partially within its boundaries, for any of the purposes authorized by Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191. Public agencies and other persons are hereby authorized to make contracts with a municipality under which the municipality will make a sewage disposal system available to a public agency or group of public agencies or to other persons and furnish waste collection, transportation, treatment and sewage disposal services by the municipality’s sewage disposal system. The contract may be upon such terms and for such period of time as the parties may agree and may provide that it will remain in effect until any bonds issued or to be issued by the municipality, and any bonds which may be issued to refund the same are paid; the contract may contain provisions to assure equitable treatment of persons or public agencies who contract with the municipality for waste collection, transportation, treatment and sewage disposal services from the same sewage disposal system; may contain provisions requiring any public agency or other person to regulate the quality and strength of waste to be handled by the sewage disposal system; shall provide the method of determining the amounts to be paid by a public agency or other person to the municipality; may provide for the sale or lease to or use of by the municipality of any sewage disposal system or any part thereof at the time owned or to be acquired by a public agency or other person; may provide that the municipality shall operate any sewage disposal system or part thereof at the time owned or to be acquired by a public agency or other person; may provide that a public agency shall have the right to continued performance of such services after the amortization of the municipality’s investment in the sewage disposal system during the useful life thereof upon payments of reasonable charges therefor, reduced to take into consideration such amortization; and may contain such other provisions and requirements as the municipality and a public agency or other person may determine to be appropriate or necessary. A municipality may also provide in its contract that the municipality shall have the right to use any streets, alleys and public ways and places within the jurisdiction of a public agency or other person during the term of the contract.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1975).

§ 21-27-173.
Payments by public agency under contract.

Payments by a public agency to the municipality for waste collection, transportation, treatment and sewage disposal services and facilities may be made from the income of the public agency’s waterworks system or water supply system or its sewerage system, treatment facilities or sewage disposal system or of both such systems or of its combined waterworks, water supply, treatment facilities, sewerage and sewage disposal systems, as may be prescribed in the contract between the municipality and the public agency, or as otherwise authorized by law. Such payments shall constitute an operating expense of the system or systems whose revenues are thus to be applied. Payments to be made under the contract by the public agency from the income of its waterworks system, water supply system, treatment facility, sewerage system or sewage disposal system or both such systems or its combined waterworks, water supply, treatment facility, sewerage and sewage disposal systems shall be subordinate to amounts required to be paid from the net revenues of such systems for principal of and interest on bonds of the public agency which are outstanding at the time of the making of the contract and which are payable solely from such net revenues unless the ordinance or resolution authorizing such outstanding bonds of the public agency expressly reserves the right to accord such contract payments a priority over such public agency’s bond requirements. No provision of Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191 shall be construed to prohibit any public agency, otherwise permitted by law to issue bonds, from issuing bonds in the manner provided by law for the construction, renovation, repair or development of waste disposal facilities within the jurisdictional limits of the public agency. Except to the extent provided in Section 21-27-175, neither the municipality nor the holder of any bonds of the municipality shall have the right to demand payment of the public agency’s obligation out of any funds raised or to be raised by taxation, but such contracts shall constitute an obligation of the public agency and shall be binding upon such public agency according to its terms and shall continue in effect until all bonds specified therein and refunding bonds issued in lieu of such bonds and all other obligations thereunder shall have been paid. Payments made or to be made to a municipality by a public agency or other person pursuant to a contract for waste collection, transportation, treatment and sewage disposal services and facilities shall be determined by the method specified in the contract and shall not be subject to approval or review by the public service commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1975).

§ 21-27-175.
Public agency may levy ad valorem tax.

Any public agency having taxing powers, other than a county or a municipality as herein defined, is authorized to levy a special ad valorem tax not to exceed four (4) mills upon all taxable property within its geographical limits to pay all or a portion of the payments to be made by that public agency under a contract between the public agency and a municipality and if the contract as authorized by the governing body of the public agency so provides, then the contract shall constitute an obligation against the taxing power of the public agency to the extent therein provided. The special ad valorem tax millage authorized by Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191 shall not be reimbursable by the state under the provisions otherwise made for reimbursements under the homestead exemption laws.

The proceeds derived from two (2) mills of the levy authorized herein shall be included in the ten percent (10%) increase limitation under Section 27-39-321, and the proceeds derived from any additional millage levied hereunder in excess of two (2) mills shall be excluded from such limitation for the first year of such additional levy and shall be included within such limitation in any year thereafter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 8; Laws, 1987, ch. 507, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1987).

§ 21-27-177.
Public agency to make necessary adjustments of rates.

Whenever a public agency and a municipality shall have executed a contract under Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191 and the payments thereunder are to be made either wholly or partly from the revenues of the public agency’s waterworks system, water supply system, treatment facility, sewerage system or sewage disposal system or from both systems or a combination of both systems, the duty is hereby imposed on the public agency to establish and maintain and from time to time to adjust the rates charged by the public agency for the services of such system or systems, to the end that the revenues therefrom together with any taxes levied in support thereof will be sufficient at all times to pay: (a) the expense of operating and maintaining such system; (b) all of the public agency’s obligations to the municipality under the contract; and (c) all of the public agency’s obligations under and in connection with revenue bonds theretofore issued, or which may be issued thereafter secured by revenues of such system or systems. The contract may require the use of consulting engineers and financial experts to advise the public agency whether and when such rates are to be adjusted.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1975).

§ 21-27-179.
Issuance of bonds by municipality.

For the purpose of acquiring, constructing, improving, enlarging, extending and repairing a sewage disposal system or sewage disposal systems, a municipality is authorized to issue bonds payable from and secured by a pledge of all or any part of revenues under any contract or contracts it enters into under Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191 and from all or any part of any revenues derived from the operation of the waterworks system, water supply system, treatment facility, sewerage system or sewage disposal system and pledged for such purpose by the municipality. Said bonds shall be in such form and denomination as prescribed by the governing body of the municipality. Such bonds may be serial or term; redeemable, with or without premium, or nonredeemable; registered or coupon bonds with registration privileges as to either principal and interest; principal only or both; shall bear interest at a rate or rates to be determined pursuant to the sale of the bonds; and shall be payable at such time or times and shall mature at such time or times not exceeding the said estimated life of the contemplated system or improvement, but in no event exceeding thirty (30) years from their date, and at such place or places as shall be prescribed in the bond resolution authorizing their issuance; provided, however, that any bond issue to be awarded and sold to the United States of America or any agency thereof shall mature at such time or times, not to exceed thirty-five (35) years, as shall be prescribed in the ordinance authorizing their issuance. Any provisions of the general laws to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds and interest coupons issued pursuant to the authority of Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191 shall possess all the qualities of negotiable instruments. The bonds and the interest coupons shall be executed in such manner and shall be substantially in the form prescribed in the authorizing resolution. In case any of the officers whose signatures or countersignatures appear on the bonds or interest coupons shall cease to be such officers before delivery of such bonds, such signatures or countersignatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if they had remained in office until such delivery. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid; all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity; all interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted; the lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest rate specified for the same bond issue. Such bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972. Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%). If serial bonds, such bonds shall mature annually, and the first maturity date thereof shall not be more than five (5) years from the date of such bonds. Such bonds shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the state of Mississippi. The bonds and interest coupons shall be exempt from all state, county, municipal and other taxation under the laws of the state of Mississippi. No bond issued pursuant to Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191 shall constitute an indebtedness of a municipality within the meaning of any statutory or charter restriction or limitation upon indebtedness. Such bonds shall be sold on sealed bids at public sale in the manner provided by Section 31-19-25, as now or hereafter amended, upon such terms as the governing authorities of the municipality may determine, not inconsistent with the provisions of Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191, but no sale shall be made at a price so low as to require the payment of interest on the money received therefor at more than that allowed in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, computed with relation to the absolute maturity of the bonds, in accordance with standard tables of bond values, excluding from such computation the amount of any premium to be paid on redemption of any bonds prior to maturity. Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191 shall be full and complete authority for the issuance of the bonds provided for herein, and no restriction or limitation otherwise prescribed by law shall apply herein, nor shall such bonds constitute an indebtedness of the municipality within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 10; Laws, 1981, ch. 494, § 2; Laws, 1982, ch 434, § 7; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1983).

§ 21-27-181.
Municipality to make necessary adjustments of rates.

While any such bonds are outstanding, it shall be the duty of the governing body of the municipality to fix, maintain and collect rates and charges for services furnished or made available by the sewage disposal system, adequate to pay maintenance and operation costs of the expenses allocable to the sewage disposal system, payment of principal of and interest on such bonds, and to provide and maintain the funds created by the resolution authorizing the bonds. Interest to accrue on the bonds and administrative expenses to estimated date when the sewage disposal system will become revenue producing and reserve funds created by the resolution authorizing the bonds may be set aside out of bond proceeds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 11; Laws, 1980, ch. 523, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 26, 1980).

§ 21-27-183.
Validation of bonds.

All bonds issued pursuant to Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191 shall be validated as now provided by law by Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1975).

§ 21-27-185.
Investment of bond proceeds.

Proceeds from the sale of bonds may be invested, pending their use, in such certificates of deposit as are specified in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust indenture securing them, and the earnings on such investments applied as provided in such resolution or trust indenture.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1975).

§ 21-27-187.
Bonds exempt from inclusion in debt-limitations; bonds are legal investments.

All bonds issued under Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191 shall be and are hereby exempt from inclusion in debts in determining whether additional bonds may be issued by such municipality and are declared to be legal and authorized investments for banks, savings banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, fiduciaries, trustees and for the sinking fund of municipalities, towns, villages, school districts or any other political corporation or subdivision of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1975).

§ 21-27-189.
Other powers and authority of municipality.

A municipality, as defined in Section 21-27-163, is authorized and empowered, in the discretion of its governmental authorities, to exercise the following powers and authority within the area and territories comprising the metropolitan area of which it is a part:

To operate and manage sewerage systems, sewage treatment facilities and sewage disposal systems and related facilities serving the metropolitan area in conformance with the metropolitan area plan.

To construct, operate and maintain sewerage systems, sewage treatment facilities and sewage disposal systems in the manner and to the extent required by the metropolitan area plan.

To accept and utilize grants and other funds from any source for waste treatment management purposes.

To establish and maintain rates and charges for the use of the services of such sewerage systems, sewage treatment facilities and sewage disposal systems within the metropolitan area, and from time to time to adjust such rates, to the end that the revenues therefrom will be sufficient at all times to pay the expenses of operating and maintaining such works, facilities and systems and all of the municipality’s obligations under any contract or bond resolution with respect thereto.

To incur short and long-term indebtedness under the provisions of Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191 or other applicable statutes.

To adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the implementation of the metropolitan area plan and to assure the payment of each participating person or public agency of its proportionate share of treatment costs.

To refuse to receive any waste from any public agency or subdivision thereof or any other person which does not comply with the provisions of the metropolitan area plan applicable to the particular area within which such public agency or subdivision thereof or any other person is located.

To accept industrial waste for treatment and to require the pretreatment of same when within the opinion of the municipality such pretreatment is necessary.

To adopt all necessary and reasonable rules and regulations to carry out and effectuate any waste treatment plan adopted for the metropolitan area.

To require by ordinance or by contract with a public agency or other person that all waste within the metropolitan area be disposed of through sewerage systems, treatment facilities and sewage disposal systems which comprise a part of the metropolitan area plan, to the extent that the same may be available, but no public agency shall be precluded from constructing, operating and maintaining its own sewerage system if the same be a part of the metropolitan area plan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1975).

§ 21-27-191.
Aforesaid sections are cumulative.

Sections 21-27-161 through 21-27-191 are cumulative of other statutes now or hereafter enacted relating to the issuance of bonds; the collection, transportation, treatment or disposal of wastes; and the design, construction, acquisition or approval of facilities for such purposes, and the municipality may exercise all presently held powers in the furtherance of said sections.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 496, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1975).